Washington statutes.
RCW 39.58.020

Public funds—Protection against loss.

All public funds deposited in public depositaries, including investment deposits and accrued interest thereon, shall be protected against loss, as provided in this chapter.

[ 1996 c 256 s 2; 1984 c 177 s 11; 1983 c 66 s 5; 1973 c 126 s 10; 1969 ex.s. c 193 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 66: See note following RCW 39.58.010.